Utah statutes.
17-16a-6.   Interest in business entity regulated by county -- Disclosure.

Every appointed or elected officer who is an officer, director, agent, or employee or the owner of a substantial interest in any business entity which is subject to the regulation of the county in which he is an elected or appointed officer shall disclose the position held and the precise nature and value of his interest upon first becoming appointed or elected, and again during January of each year thereafter during which he continues to be an appointed or elected officer. The disclosure shall be made in a sworn statement filed with the county legislative body. The commission shall report the substance of all such disclosure statements to the members of the governing body or may provide to the members of the governing body, copies of the disclosure statement within 30 days after the statement is received. This section does not apply to instances where the value of the interest does not exceed $2,000, and life insurance policies and annuities shall not be considered in determining the value of any such interest.

